src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-aqlmwldw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - aʼlmõldõ: # Verb 54 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Inf: [aʼlmõldõ, almõldõ]
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Ger: [aʼlmõldõs, almõldõs]
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Sup: [aʼlmõldõm, almõldõm]
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Sup+Ine: [aʼlmõldõmõs, almõldõmõs]
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Sup+Ela: [aʼlmõldõmõst, almõldõmõst]
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Sup+Tra: [aʼlmõldõmõks, almõldõmõks]
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Sup+Abe: [aʼlmõldõmõt, almõldõmõt]
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [aʼlmõldõb, almõldõb]
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [aʼlmõldõt, almõldõt]
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [aʼlmõldõbõd, almõldõbõd]
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [aʼlmõldiz, almõldiz]
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [[aʼlmõldizt, aʼlmõldiztõ], [almõldizt, aʼlmõldiztõ]]
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [[aʼlmõldizt, aʼlmõldiztõ], [almõldizt, aʼlmõldiztõ]]
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: [aʼlmõld, almõld]
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Cond+Sg3: [aʼlmõldõks, almõldõks]
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: [aʼlmõld, almõld]
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [aʼlmõld, almõld]
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: [aʼlmõldõgid, almõldõgid]
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Jus+Sg3: [aʼlmõldõg, almõldõg]
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Quo+Sg3: [aʼlmõldiji, almõldiji]
     aʼlmõldõ+V+ActPrfPrc: [aʼlmõldõn, almõldõn]
     aʼlmõldõ+V+PssPrfPrc: [aʼlmõldõd, almõldõd]
